District of Columbia statutes.
47-355.04

Reporting requirements of agency heads and chief financial officers.

(a)

By October 1 of each year, an agency head and agency fiscal officer shall jointly submit to the Chief Financial Officer a monthly spending plan and a Schedule A, each by source of funds, based on the budget submitted to Congress. If an agency’s budget is changed after Congressional submission, a revised spending plan and a revised Schedule A, each by source of funds, must be submitted to the Chief Financial Officer within one month of final approval of the budget.

(b)

Any revision to an agency’s approved operating budget during a fiscal year shall be reflected in a revised spending plan submitted to the Chief Financial Officer within one month of the approval of the revised budget.

Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-285, § 2, 50 DCR 940
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-293, § 2(c), 54 DCR 1083
D.C. Law 16-293, in subsec. (a), substituted “agency fiscal officer” for “agency chief financial officer” and “one month” for “15 days”; and in subsec. (b), substituted “one month” for “10 days”.